South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4626.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-320.  (A) The Director of the Department of Public Health shall create within the department the Division of Men's Health. (B)(1) The Division of Men's Health shall concentrate on raising awareness of health issues specific to men including, but not limited to, prostate cancer, testicular cancer, heart disease, smoking cessation, respiratory illness, unintentional injuries, health equity, and cultural competency. (2) Additionally, the department shall work with mental health providers to raise awareness of the mental health of men and address developmental issues of boys, violence prevention, self-esteem, and communication. (C) The Division of Men's Health shall complete an annual assessment in collaboration with the schools of public health in South Carolina of the status of men's health and recommend policy developments to address those needs and identify the services needed. The division shall review the assessment and make recommendations to the General Assembly to address health disparities among men. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----